Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 5. Business Duties and Restrictions.

Sec. 06.60.320.
False, misleading, or deceptive advertising prohibited.

A person may not advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, in any manner a statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for a mortgage loan that is false, misleading, or deceptive.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 45 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, and disciplinary action, see 3 AAC 14, art. 6.

Sec. 06.60.325.
Display of unique identifier.

A person operating as a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage loan originator shall clearly display the unique identifier assigned to the person by the registry on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations, and advertisements, including business cards or websites, and any other documents as established by regulation or order of the department.

History.

(§ 46 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.330.
Compliance with federal requirements.

A person subject to this chapter shall conduct the person’s mortgage loan activities in compliance with

12 U.S.C. 2601 — 2617 (Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974);

12 U.S.C. 2801 — 2810 (Home Mortgage Disclosure Act of 1975);

12 U.S.C. 2901 — 2908 (Community Reinvestment Act of 1977);

12 U.S.C. 5101 — 5116 (Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008);

15 U.S.C. 1601 — 1666j and 1671 — 1693r (Consumer Credit Protection Act);

42 U.S.C. 3601 — 3631 (Fair Housing Act of 1968);

any other federal statute the purpose of which is to regulate residential mortgage lending; and

regulations adopted under the statutes identified in (1) — (7) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 47 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, and disciplinary action, see 3 AAC 14, art. 6.

Sec. 06.60.340.
Prohibited activities.

A person who is required to be licensed under this chapter and a person who is licensed under AS 06.20 may not, in connection with a mortgage loan transaction,

misrepresent or conceal a material fact or make a false promise likely to influence, persuade, or induce an applicant for a mortgage loan or a borrower to enter into a mortgage loan transaction;

pursue a course of misrepresentation through an agent;

directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or mislead a borrower or lender or to defraud a person;

engage in any unfair or deceptive act or practice toward any person;

obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;

solicit or enter into a contract with a borrower that provides, in substance, that the person subject to this chapter may earn a fee or commission through using the person’s best efforts to obtain a loan, even though a loan is not actually obtained for the borrower;

solicit, advertise, or enter into a contract for specific interest rates, points, or other financing terms unless the terms are actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising, or contracting;

conduct a business covered by this chapter without holding a valid license as required under this chapter, or assist a person in the conduct of business under this chapter without a valid license as required under this chapter;

fail to make disclosures as required by this chapter or by another applicable state or federal statute, including regulations adopted under the statute;

fail to comply with this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter or fail to comply with another state or federal statute, including regulations adopted under the statute, applicable to a business authorized or conducted under this chapter;

make, in any manner, false or deceptive statements or representations, including statements or representations about rates, points, or other financing terms or conditions, or engage in bait and switch advertising;

negligently make a false statement or knowingly omit a material fact in connection with information or reports filed with the department or the registry or in connection with an investigation conducted by the department;

make a payment, threat, or promise, directly or indirectly, to a person for the purposes of influencing the independent judgment of the person in connection with a mortgage loan, or make a payment, threat, or promise, directly or indirectly, to an appraiser of a property, for the purpose of influencing the independent judgment of the appraiser with respect to the value of the property;

collect, charge, attempt to collect, attempt to charge, or use or propose an agreement purporting to collect or charge a fee prohibited by this chapter;

cause or require a borrower to obtain property insurance coverage in an amount that exceeds the replacement cost, as established by the property insurer, of the improvements;

improperly refuse to issue a satisfaction of a mortgage loan;

fail to account for or deliver to a person money, a document, or another thing of value obtained in connection with a mortgage loan, including money provided for a real estate appraisal or a credit report, if the person is not entitled to retain the money under the circumstances;

pay, receive, or collect, in whole or in part, a commission, fee, or other compensation for brokering a mortgage loan in violation of this chapter, including a mortgage loan brokered by an unlicensed person;

fail to disburse money in accordance with a written commitment or agreement to make a mortgage loan;

engage in a transaction, practice, or course of business that is not engaged in by the person in good faith or fair dealing or that constitutes a fraud on a person in connection with the brokering, making, purchase, or sale of a mortgage loan;

influence or attempt to influence, through coercion, extortion, or bribery, the development, reporting, result, or review of a real estate appraisal sought in connection with a mortgage loan; this paragraph does not prohibit a person from asking an appraiser to

consider additional appropriate property information;

provide further detail, substantiation, or explanation for the appraiser’s value determination; or

correct errors in the appraisal report;

make a false or misleading statement in a mortgage loan commitment or prequalification letter, or omit material information necessary to make the statements made not misleading, if the person knew or reasonably should have known the statement was false or misleading or the omission consisted of material information necessary to make the statements made not misleading;

engage in a practice or course of business in which the ultimate rates, terms, or costs of mortgage loans are materially worse for the borrower than they are represented to be in the first good faith estimates the person provides to the borrower, unless

the person’s generally published or advertised rates, terms, or costs, if any, change for a borrower’s loan program; or

new or changed information from the borrower makes it necessary to change the loan program offered to the borrower;

represent that the person has a license, registration, title, certification, sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or connection that the person does not have;

engage in unfair, deceptive, or fraudulent advertising; or

authorize, direct, plan, or aid in the publishing, distribution, or circulation of a materially false statement or a material misrepresentation concerning the licensee’s business or concerning mortgage loans originated in the course of the licensee’s business in this or another state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 48 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, and disciplinary action, see 3 AAC 14, art. 6.

Sec. 06.60.350.
Certain refinancing prohibited.

A covered person may not refinance a mortgage loan within 12 months after the date the mortgage loan is closed unless the refinancing is beneficial to the borrower.

The factors to be considered when determining if refinancing is beneficial to the borrower under this section may include whether

the borrower’s new monthly payment is lower than the total of all monthly obligations being refinanced, after taking into account the costs and fees of the refinancing;

the amortization period of the new mortgage loan is different from the amortization period of the mortgage loan being refinanced;

the borrower receives cash in excess of the costs and fees of the refinancing;

the rate of interest of the borrower’s promissory note is reduced;

the mortgage loan changes from an adjustable rate loan to a fixed rate loan; in a determination under this paragraph, the department may take into account costs and fees;

the refinancing is necessary to respond to a bona fide personal need or an order of a court of competent jurisdiction;

the original term of the mortgage loan being refinanced is two years or less; and

the refinancing is being made to prevent a foreclosure on an existing mortgage loan.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.360.
Escrow accounts.

A covered person and a borrower may agree that the covered person will keep in an escrow account all money that the borrower is required to pay to defray future taxes or insurance premiums or for other lawful purposes. The escrow account must be segregated from the other accounts of the covered person and be subject to a written escrow agreement. The covered person may not commingle the borrower’s money with the general funds of the covered person. Money deposited in an escrow account under this subsection shall be maintained in the account until it is disbursed in accordance with the written escrow agreement.

A covered person may not require a borrower to pay money into escrow to defray future taxes, to defray insurance premiums, or for another purpose, in connection with a subordinate mortgage loan, unless an escrow account for that purpose is not being maintained for the mortgage loan that is superior to the subordinate mortgage loan.

If the billing address of a covered person who is holding money in escrow for insurance premiums changes, the covered person shall notify the insurer in writing about the change of billing address within 30 days after the change or 60 days before the renewal date of the insurance policy, whichever is later.

A covered person who accepts money belonging to a borrower in connection with a mortgage loan shall deposit all of the money into an escrow account maintained by the covered person in a bank or another recognized depository institution. In this subsection, “recognized depository institution” means a person who is organized as a financial institution under the laws of a state or the federal government and whose deposits are insured by a federal agency.

Money held in an escrow account under this section is exempt from execution, attachment, or garnishment under AS 09.38 and is not subject to a claim under AS

09.38.065

.

In this section, “escrow account” means an account

to which a borrower makes payments for obligations related to the real property that is the subject of a residential mortgage loan of the borrower;

held by a third person; and

from which the third person identified in (2) of this subsection disburses money in accordance with a written agreement to pay obligations related to the real property that is the subject of a residential mortgage loan of the borrower.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 49 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.370.
Criminal penalties.

The department may report a violation of (b) — (e) of this section to the attorney general, who may institute the proper proceedings to enforce the criminal penalties provided in (b) — (e) of this section.

A person who knowingly provides false or misleading information to the department that is material under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person who knowingly fails to account for or deliver to a person money, deposits, or checks or other forms of negotiable instruments in violation of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A licensee who knowingly fails to disburse money belonging to the borrower without just cause is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Unless the person is exempt from licensing under this chapter, a person who knowingly operates in this state as a mortgage lender, mortgage broker, or mortgage loan originator without a license issued under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 50 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Cross references. --

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

for fines and

12.55.135

for imprisonment.

Sec. 06.60.380.
Definition of “covered person.”

In AS

06.60.320

—

06.60.380

, “covered person” means a mortgage licensee or a person who is licensed under AS 06.20.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)